Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-137
Drainage ditches; petition; hearing; notice.

Upon filing of the report and estimate of the surveyor in the office of the county clerk, it shall be the duty of the county board to set a day for hearing thereon, not more than forty days from the date of said filing, and to give notice by publication thereof for three weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the county.

Laws 1911, c. 141, § 3, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 1754;

C.S.1922, § 1701;

C.S.1929, § 31-137;

R.S.1943, § 31-137.